Washington statutes.
RCW 18.73.155

Requirements—Military training or experience.

An applicant with military training or experience satisfies the training or experience requirements of this chapter unless the secretary determines that the military training or experience is not substantially equivalent to the standards of this state.

[ 2011 c 32 s 7.]